Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-369
Withdrawable account, defined.

Withdrawable account shall mean a savings deposit or other authorized account or deposit of an association which does not represent capital stock.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 14.